Maryland, session 2026, SB0070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
11–808.
(a) An individual may obtain a high school diploma by examination as provided
in this section if the individual:
(1) has not obtained a high school diploma;
(2) resides in this State; and
(3) except as provided in subsection (b) of this section:
(i) is not subject to compulsory school attendance under § 7–301 of
the Education Article; and
(ii) has withdrawn from a regular full–time public or private school
program.
(b) An individual is not subject to the requirements of subsection (a)(3) of this
section if the individual participates in:
(1) a GED Option Program administered by the State Department of
Education that creates a pathway to a high school diploma by examination for currently
enrolled high school English language learner students under the age of 21 years who have
experienced interrupted education and have a lower level of English proficiency than their
peers; OR

SENATE BILL 70 3
(2) THE GED OPTION PILOT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER §
11–808.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
11–808.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PILOT PROGRAM” MEANS THE GED OPTION PILOT
PROGRAM.
(B) (1) THERE IS A GED OPTION PILOT PROGRAM IN THE STATE.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PILOT PROGRAM IS TO EXPAND THE GED
OPTION PROGRAM TO STUDENTS BEYOND ENGLISH LANGUAGE LEARNERS IN
SELECTED SCHOOL DISTRICTS TO ENSURE THAT THE STUDENTS HAVE A PATHWAY
TO OBTAIN A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA AND ARE PREPARED TO ENTER
POSTSECONDARY PROGRAMMING OR THE WORKFORCE.
(C) THE PILOT PROGRAM SHALL BEGIN IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR
AND SHALL CONTINUE FOR 2 SCHOOL YEARS.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT:
(1) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION AND THE PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPERINTENDENTS’ ASSOCIATION OF
MARYLAND, SHALL DEVELOP CRITERIA, INCLUDING RECOGNITION OF GEOGRAPHIC
DIVERSITY, FOR THE SELECTION OF AT LEAST THREE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT PROGRAM; AND
(2) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION, SHALL USE THE CRITERIA DEVELOPED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION TO SELECT AT LEAST THREE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS TO PARTICIPATE
IN THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(E) EACH COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT FROM A PARTICIPATING LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM MAY SELECT UP TO 150 STUDENTS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT
PROGRAM.
(F) A STUDENT SELECTED TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT PROGRAM:
(1) MAY BEGIN THE GED OPTION PROGRAM WHEN THE STUDENT IS
AT LEAST 17 YEARS OLD;
(2) MUST BE AT SIGNIFICANT RISK OF NOT SUCCESSFULLY
COMPLETING HIGH SCHOOL; AND

SENATE BILL 70
(3) SHALL TAKE THE HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA BY EXAMINATION
BEFORE THE CONCLUSION OF THE GED OPTION PROGRAM.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
SHALL EXPLORE OPTIONS FOR EXPANDING THE GED OPTION PROGRAM BASED ON
RESULTS OF THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(H) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2028, AND DECEMBER 1, 2029, THE
DEPARTMENT AND THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION JOINTLY SHALL
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY REGARDING THE
EFFECTIVENESS OF THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT
PROGRAM FROM EACH PARTICIPATING LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM;
(II) FEEDBACK FROM EDUCATORS, STUDENTS, AND PARENTS OF
STUDENTS PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROGRAM ON WAYS TO IMPROVE THE
GED OPTION PROGRAM;
(III) THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS WHO EARNED A HIGH SCHOOL
DIPLOMA AS A RESULT OF COMPLETING THE PILOT PROGRAM; AND
(IV) AN EVALUATION OF THE PILOT PROGRAM AND THE GED
OPTION PROGRAM WITH ANY RECOMMENDATIONS FOR IMPROVEMENTS.
(I) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
JOINTLY MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE PILOT PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
11–810.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MDIPLOMAWORKS PATHWAY” MEANS AN
ALTERNATIVE PATHWAY TO EARN A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA IN THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 70 5
(B) THE MDIPLOMAWORKS PATHWAY IS A METHOD TO RECOGNIZE AND
CERTIFY HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA ACHIEVEMENT THROUGH DEMONSTRATED
ACADEMIC AND CAREER COMPETENCIES, INCLUDING WORKFORCE EXPERIENCE.
(C) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY OBTAIN A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA THROUGH THE
MDIPLOMAWORKS PATHWAY IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(1) HAS NOT OBTAINED A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA;
(2) RESIDES IN THE STATE;
(3) IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE
REQUIREMENT UNDER § 7–301 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE; AND
(4) HAS WITHDRAWN FROM A REGULAR FULL–TIME PUBLIC OR
PRIVATE SCHOOL PROGRAM.
(D) TO EARN A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA THROUGH THE MDIPLOMAWORKS
PATHWAY, AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL DEMONSTRATE EQUIVALENCY TO A MARYLAND
HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA BY COMPLETION OF A COMBINATION OF THE FOLLOWING
COMPONENTS AS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT:
(1) EARNING INDUSTRY–RECOGNIZED CREDENTIALS;
(2) DEMONSTRATING FOUNDATIONAL ACADEMIC SKILLS THROUGH
FORMAL ASSESSMENTS;
(3) COMPLETING CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION
COURSEWORK; AND
(4) COMPLETING AN ON–THE–JOB LEARNING EXPERIENCE.
(E) A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA SHALL BE AWARDED TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
COMPLETES THE MDIPLOMAWORKS PATHWAY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE SECRETARY AND THE STATE BOARD OF
EDUCATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in calendar years 2027 and
2028, the Maryland Department of Labor shall publish on its website, and include in any
publications that describe how adults may obtain a high school diploma, information on the
MDiplomaWorks pathway established under § 11–810 of the Labor and Employment Article,
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, in order to inform potentially eligible applicants about
the new pathway to obtain a high school diploma.

SENATE BILL 70
SECTION 3. 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. Section 1 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 4 years and, at
the end of September 30, 2030, Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.